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1.
(@)

When troubleshooting Multiplex OBD (M-OBD) ve-
hicles, the only difference from the usual trouble-
shooting procedure is that you connect to the ve-
hicle the hand-held tester, and read off various data
output from the vehicle’s engine ECU.

The vehicle’s on-board computer lights up check
engine warning light (CHK ENG) on the instrument
panel when the computer detects a malfunction in
the computer itself or in drive system components.
In addition to an indication of the CHK ENG lighting
up when a malfunction is detected, the applicable
Diagnostic Trouble Codes (DTC) recorded in the
engine ECU memory (See page DI-17). If the mal-
function has been repaired, the CHK ENG goes off
automatially but the DTCs remain recorded in the
engine ECU memory.

Tocheckthe DTCs, connectthe hand —heldtester
to Data Link Connector 3 (DLCS3) on the vehicle or
read the diagnostic trouble code which is indicated
on the multi information display when TC and CG
terminals onthe DLC3 are connected. The hand -
held tester also enables you to erase the DTCs and
check freezed frame data and various forms of en-
gine data. (For operating instructions, see the
instruction book.)

Thediagnosis system operatesin normalmode
during normal vehicle use. It also has a check (test)
mode for technicians to simulate malfunction symp-
toms and troubleshoot. Most DTCs use 2 trip detec-
tion logic* to prevent erroneous detection, and en-
sure thorough malfunction detection. By switching
the engine ECUto check (test) mode usinghand -
held tester when troubleshooting, the technician
can cause the CHK ENG light up for a malfunction
thatis only detected once ormomentarily. (Hand -
held tester only) (See step 2)

*2trip detection logic: When alogic malfunctionis

first detected, the malfunction is temporarily stored
in the engine ECU memory. If the same malfunction
is detected again during the second drive test, this
second detection causes the CHK ENG light up.
The 2 trip repeats the same mode a 2nd time. (How-
ever, the |G switch must be turned OFF between the
1st trip and 2nd trip.)
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. Freezeframedata:

Freeze frame data records the engine condition
when a malfunction , is detected.

Because freeze frame data records the engine
conditions (fuel system, calculator load, Water tem-
perature, fuel trim,engine speed, vehicle speed,
etc.) when the malfunction is detected, when trou-
bleshooting it is useful for determining whether the
vehicle was running or stopped, the engine warmed
upornot,theair -fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthe

time of the malfunction.

(b) Check the DLCS. -
Thevehicle’sengineECUusesISO 14230 forcommu-
nication. The terminal arrangement of DLC3 complies
withSAEJ 1962andmatchesthelSO  14230format.
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DLC3
A04550
Terminal No. Connection / Voltage or Resistance Condition

7 Bus @ Line/Pulse generation During transmission

4 Chassis Ground <> BodyGround/ 1 Q orless Always

16 Battery Positive <= BodyGround/9 ~ 14V Always
HINT:
If your display shows "UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE”
whenyou have connectedthe cable ofthe hand -heldtesterto

DLC3, turnedtheignition switch ON and operated the hand -
held tester, there is a problem on the vehicle side or tool side.

. If communicationis normalwhenthetoolis connected to
another vehicle, inspect DLC3 on the original vehicle.

. Ifcommunicationis still not possible when thetoolis con-
nected to another vehicle, the problem is probably in the
tool itself, so consult the Service Department listed in the
tool’s instruction manual.

2UZ-FEENGINE (RM630E)



DI-6

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

Fl12547

Ir T ]
E‘g1‘2!3§4i 56|7/8]"

t T
{ 9‘1q11§1213§14l15116g

A04550

2UZ-FE ENGINE

(RMB30E)

2. INSPECT DIAGNOSIS (Normal Mode)

(@ Check the DTC using hand-held tester.

NOTICE:

Hand-held tester only: When the diagnosis system is
switched from normal mode to check (test) mode, it erases
all DTCs and freezed frame data recorded in normal mode.
So before switching modes, always check the DTCs and
freezed frame data, and note them down.

(1) Prepare the hand-held tester.

(2) Connect the hand-held tester to DLCS3.

(8)  Turnthe ignition switch ON and push the hand-held
tester main switch ON.

(4) Use the hand-held tester to check the DTCs and
freezed frame data, note them down. (For operating
instructions, seethehand -heldtesterinstruction
book.)

(5) See page DI-17 to confirm the details of the DTCs.

(b) Checkthe DTC
(1) Turntheignition switch ON.

(2) Using SST, connectbetweenterminals 13 (TC) and
4 (CG) of DLCS.

SST 09843 -18040

(3) Read the DTC on the multiinformation display.

HINT:

. IfaDTCis notindicated, checkthe TCterminal circuit
(See page DI-22).

. Ifacode No.89isindicated, read the number of blinks of
the 2nd STRT indication (only for A/T)/ETCS indicator
(only for M/T) to get the DTC for the electric throttle control
system (ETCS).

NOTICE:

When simulating symptoms withoutahand -heldtesterto

check the DTCs, use normal mode. For code on the DTC

chart subject to 2 trip detection logic”, turn the ignition
switch OFF after the symptom is simulated the first time.

Then repeat the simulation process again. When the prob-

lem has been simulated twice, the CHK ENG light up and

the DTCs are recorded in the engine ECU.
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() Checkthe DTC for ETCS

(1) Turnignition switch ON.
HINT:
If the 2nd STRT indicator (only for A/T)/ETCS indicator (only for
M/T) does not light up, troubleshoot the combination meter
(See page DI-21).

(2) Using SST, connectbetweenterminals 13 (TC)and -
4 (CG) of DLCS.
SST 09843 -18040
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DLC3
A04550
(8) Readthe diagnostic trouble code from 2nd STRT in-
dicator (only for A/T)/ETCS indicator (only for M/T)
on the combination meter.
2 nd HINT:
ECTS If a DTC is not output, check the TC terminal circuit (See page

STRT DI-22).

(4) Check details of the malfunction using the DTC

(Only for M/T)  (Only for A/T) chart on page DI-17.
05963 (5) After completing the check, disconnectterminals 13
(TC) and 4 (CG) and turn off the display.
Normal HINT:
0.25 sec. In the event of 2 or more malfunction codes, indication will begin
from the smaller numbered code and continue in order to the
ON ON ON ON lager.

(d) Clearthe DTC.
The DTCs and freezed frame data will be erased by either

actions.
0.25 sec. (1) Operatingthehand -heldtesterto erasethe codes.
Fl0294 (Seethehand -heldtester’sinstructionbook forop-
erating instructions.)
Code N&;SZe%ﬁdS 14 5 sec. (2) Disconnecting the battery terminals of EFI and
45 sec. 45 seo. THROTTLE fuses.
X NOTICE:
sec. Ifthe hand -heldtester switchesthe engine ECUfromnor-
ON mal mode to check (test) mode or vice -versa,oriftheigni-
- OFF 0ssecc. | Repear | tionswitchisturnedfrom ONto ACCor OFF during check
\ One Cycle (test) mode, the DTCs and freezed frame data will be
Start erased.

BR3589

2UZ-FEENGINE (RM630E)
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3. INSPECT DIAGNOSIS (Check (Test) Mode)
HINT:
Hand-held tester only:
Compared to the normal mode, the check (test) mode has an
increased sensitivity to detect malfunctions.
Furthermore, the same diagnostic items which are detected in
the normal mode can also be detected in the check (test) mode.
(@) Checkthe DTC.
(1) Initial conditions
S Battery positive voltage 11V or more.
S Throttle valve fully closed.
S Transmission in "P” or "N” position.
S Air conditioning switched OFF.
(2)  Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(3) Prepare the hand-held tester.
(4) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(5) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand—held
tester main switch ON.
(6) Switch the hand-held tester normal mode to check
(test) mode.
NOTICE:
If the hand—-held tester switches the engine ECU from nor-
mal mode to check (test) mode or vice-versa, or if the igni-
tion switch is turned from ON to ACC or OFF during check
(test) mode, the DTCs and freezed frame data will be
erased.
(7) Start the engine.
(8) Simulate the conditions of the malfunction de-
scribed by the customer.
NOTICE:
Leave the ignition switch ON until you have checked the
DTCs, etc.
(9) After simulating the malfunction conditions, use the
hand-held tester diagnosis selector to check the
DTCs and freezed frame data, etc.
HINT:
Take care not to turn the ignition switch OFF. Turning the ignition
switch OFF switches the diagnosis system from check (test)
mode to normal mode. so all DTCs, etc. are erased.
(10) After checking the DTC, inspect the applicable cir-
cuit.
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Interface Vehicle

Toyota Break—Out—Box N09348

4.  FAIL-SAFE CHART

(b)

HINT:
S

Engine ECU Terminal Values Measurement Using

Break—-Out-Box and Hand—Held Tester

(1) Hook up the break—out-box and hand-held tester
to the vehicle.

(2) Readthe engine ECU input/output values by follow-
ing the prompts on the tester screen.

Hand-held tester has a "Snapshot” function.

This records the measured values and is effective in the
diagnosis of intermittent problems.

Please refer to the hand-held tester/break—out—box op-
erator’'s manual for further details.

If any of the following codes is recorded, the engine ECU enters fail-safe mode.

P0155/28
P0161/28
(w/ TWC)

turned off

DTC No. Fail-Safe Operation Fail-Safe Deactivation Conditions
P0100/31 Ignition timing fixed at 5°[BTDC Returned to normal condition
P0110/24 Intake air temperature is fixed at 20°C](68°F) Returned to normal condition
P0115/22 Water temperature is fixed at 80°C[(376°F) Returned to normal condition
The following condition must be repeated at least 2 times
P0120/41 VTA is fixed at 0° consecutively when closed throttle position switch is OFF:
VTA 2 0.1Vand = 095V
P0135/21
P0141/21

The heater circuit in which an abnormality is detected is

Ignition switch OFF

P0325/52

P0330/53 Max. timing retardation

Ignition switch OFF

P1300/14
P1305/15
P1310/14
P1315/14
P1320/14
P1325/14
P1330/14
P1340/14

Fuel cut

Returned to normal condition

5. CHECKFOR INTERMITTENT PROBLEMS

HAND-HELD TESTER only:

By putting the vehicle’s engine ECU in check (test) mode, 1 trip detection logic is possible instead of 2 trip
detection logic and sensitivity to detect open circuits is increased. This makes it easier to detect intermittent

problems.
(1) Clearthe DTCs.
(2) Setthe check (test) mode.

(3) Perform a simulation test (See page IN-9).
(4) Check the connector and terminal (See page IN-19).
(5) Handle the connector (See page IN-19).

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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6. BASIC INSPECTION

When the malfunction code is not confirmed in the DTC check, troubleshooting should be performed in the
order for all possible circuits to be considered as the causes of the problems. In many cases, by carrying
out the basic engine check shown in the following flow chart, the location causing the problem can be found
quickly and efficiently. Therefore, use of this check is essential in engine troubleshooting.

1 Is battery positive voltage 11 V or more when engine is stopped?

NO> Charge or replace battery.

YES

2 |lIs engine cranked?

DI-25.

NO> Proceed to problem symptoms table on page

YES

3 | Does engine start?

NO> Goto step 7.

YES

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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4 Check air filter.

P04771

PREPARATION:

Remove the air filter.

CHECK:

Visual check that the air filter is not dirty or excessive oily.
HINT:

If necessary, clean the filter.

NG> Repair or replace

5 |[Check idle speed.

D§1‘213[4i 5[6‘7]85D
[

S| sisgisis

TACH

A04550

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)

PREPARATION:
(@) Warm up the engine to normal operating temperature.
(b)  Switch off all accessories.
(c) Switch off air conditioning.
(d)  Shift transmission into "N” position.
(e) Connectthe hand-held tester to the DLC3 on the vehicle.
() If you have no hand-held tester, connect tachometer test
prove to terminal 9 (TACH) of the DLC3.
SST 09843-18030
NOTICE:
As some tachometers are not compatible with this ignition
system, we recommend that you confirm the compatibility
of your until before use.
CHECK:
Check the idle speed.
OK:
Idle speed: 650 — 750 rpm

DI-25.

NG> Proceed to problem symptoms table on page
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6 [ Check ignition timing.
oG TC PREPARATION:
(&) Warm up the engine to normal operating temperature.
(b)  Shift transmission into "N” position.
0 N (c) Keep the engine speed at idle.
‘El ‘ 213 l 4| 5%‘7 !8 iI (d) Using SST, connect terminals 13 (TC) and 4 (CG) of the
9 hof111213ha5 6| DLCs.
o SST 09843-18040
DLC3 (e) Using a timing light, connect the tester to the ignition coil
connector wire (See page EM-11).
CHECK:

Check ignition timing.
OK:

Ignition timing: 10° BTDC at idle

shoot.

NG>

Proceed to page IG-1 and continue to trouble-

DI-25.

Proceed to problem symptoms table on page

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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7 | Check fuel pressure.

B04440

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)

PREPARATION:

@)
(b)
(©)

Be sure that enough fuel is in the tank.

Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

Turn the ignition switch ON and push hand-held tester
main switch ON.

(d) Use ACTIVE TEST mode to operate the fuel pump.

(e) Please refer to the hand-held tester operator’s manual
for further detalils.

(f)  If you have no hand-held tester, connect the positive (+)
and negative (-) leads from the battery to the fuel pump
connector (See page FI-7).

CHECK:

Check that pulsation damper screw rises up when fuel pump

operates.

HINT:

At this time, you will hear a fuel flowing noise.

shoot.

NG> Proceed to page FI-7 and continue to trouble-
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8 [ Check for spark.

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the ignition coil from the spark plug.

(b) Remove the spark plug.

(c) Install the spark plug to the ignition coil.

(d) Disconnect the injector connector.

(e) Ground the spark plug.

CHECK:

Check if spark occurs while engine is being cranked.

aosess| NOTICE:

To prevent excess fuel being injected from the injectors
during this test, don’t crank the engine for more than 5~ 10
seconds at a time.

NG Proceed to page IG-1 and continue to
troubleshoot.

OK

Proceed to problem symptoms table on page
DI-25.

7. ENGINE OPERATING CONDITION

NOTICE:

The values given below for "Normal Condition” are representative values, so a vehicle may still be
normal even if its value varies from those listed here. So do not decide whether a part is faulty or not
solely according to the "Normal Condition” here.

Hand-held tester display Measurement Item Normal Condition*

Fuel System Bank 1
FUEL SYS #1 OPEN: Air-fuel ratio feedback stopped Idling after warming up: CLOSED
CLOSED: Air—fuel ratio feedback operating

Fuel System Bank 2
FUEL SYS #2 OPEN: Air—fuel ratio feedback stopped Idling after warming up: CLOSED
CLOSED: Air—fuel ratio feedback operating

Calculator Load:
CALC LOAD Current intake air volume as a proportion of max.
intake air volume

Idling: 12.0 ~ 18.0 %
Racing without load (2,500rpm): 11.0~ 17.0 %

COOLANT TEMP. Water Temp. Sensor Value After warming up: 80 ~ 95°C (176 ~ 203°F)
SHORT FT #1 Short-term Fuel Trim Bank 1 0+20%
LONG FT #1 Long-term Fuel Trim Bank 1 0+20%
SHORT FT #2 Short-term Fuel Trim Bank 2 0+20%
LONG FT #2 Long-term Fuel Trim Bank 2 0=+20%

*:1f no conditions are specifically stated for "Idling”, it means the shift lever is at N or P position, the A/C switch
is OFF and all accessory switches are OFF.

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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Hand-held tester display

Measurement Item

Normal Condition*

ENGINE SPD Engine Speed Idling: 650 ~ 750 rpm
VEHICLE SPD Vehicle Speed Vehicle stopped: 0 km/h (0 mph)
IGN ADVANCE Ignition Advance: Idli BTDC 5 ~15°
ing: ~
Ignition Timing of Cylinder No. 1 g
INTAKE AIR Intake Air Temp. Sensor Value Equivalent to ambient temp.
Idling: 4.5 ~ 5.5 gm/sec.
AFM Air Flow Rate Through Air Flow Meter Racing without load (2,500 rpm):

13.0 ~ 20.0 gm/sec.

THROTTLE POS

Voltage Output of Throttle Position Sensor
Calculated as a percentage:
0V—-0%,5V—100%

Throttle fully closed: 8 ~ 20 %
Throttle fully open: 64 ~ 96 %

Voltage Output of Oxygen Sensor

2S B1, S1 Idling: 0.1 ~0.9V
025B1S Bank 1, Sensor 1 dling: 0 0.9
Voltage Output of Oxygen Sensor Driving (50 km/h, 31 mph):
02S B1, S2 g p Y9 g ( ph)
Bank 1, Sensor 2 0.1~09V
Voltage Output of Oxygen Sensor .
02S B2, S1 Idling: 0.1 ~0.9V
Bank 2, Sensor 1
Voltage Output of Oxygen Sensor Driving (50 km/h, 31 mph):
025 B2, S2 g p yg g ( ph)
Bank 2, Sensor 2 0.1~09V
Oxygen Sensor Fuel Trim Bank 1, Sensor 1
O2FT B1, S1 0x20%
(Same as SHORT FT #1)
Oxygen Sensor Fuel Trim Bank 2, Sensor 1
O2FT B2, S1 0x20%
(Same as SHORT FT #2)
INJECTOR Fuel injection time for cylinder No.1 Idling: 2.1 ~3.9ms
STARTER SIG Starter Signal Cranking: ON
A/C SIG A/C Switch Signal A/C ON: ON
PNP SW Park/Neutral Position Switch Signal P or N position: ON
CTP Closed Throttle Position Throttle fully closed: ON

STOP LIGHT SW

Stop Light Switch Signal

Stop light switch ON: ON

Fuel Cut Idle: Fuel cut when throttle valve fully

FC IDL . . Fuel cut operating: ON
closed, during deceleration P 9
FC TAU Fuel Cut TAU: Fuel cut during very light load Fuel cut operating: ON
FUEL PUMP Fuel Pump Signal Idling: ON

EVAP (PURGE) VSV

EVAP VSV Signal

VSV operating: ON

*:1f no conditions are specifically stated for "Idling”, it means the shift lever is at N or P position, the A/C switch
is OFF and all accessory switches are OFF.

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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Hand-held tester display

Measurement Item

Normal Condition*

THROTTLE POS #2

Throttle position sensor No.2 output voltage

Throttle fully closed: 2.0 ~2.9 V
Throttle fully open: 4.7 ~5.1V

ACCEL POS

Accelerator pedal position sensor No.1
output voltage

Accelerator pedal released: 0.3 ~ 0.9 V
Accelerator pedal depressed: 3.2 ~ 4.8 V

ACCEL POS #2

Accelerator pedal position sensor No.2
output voltage

Accelerator pedal released: 1.8 ~ 2.7 V
Accelerator pedal depressed: 4.7 ~ 5.1V

THROTTLE TARGET POS

Target position of throttle valve

Idling: 0.4 ~1.1V

THROTTLE OPEN DUTY

Throttle motor opening duty ratio

Throttle fully closed: 0 %
When accelerator pedal is depressed,
duty ratio is increased

THROTTLE CLOSE DUTY

Throttle motor closed duty ratio

Throttle fully closed: 0 %
When accelerator pedal is quick released,
duty ratio is increased

detecting idle

THROTTLE MOTOR CTL Whether or not throttle motor control is permitted | Idling: ON
Whether or not magnetic clutch control .
THROTTLE CLUTCH CTL . . Idling: ON
is permitted
Whether or not electric throttle control system .
+BM . Idling: ON
power is inputted
Whether or not accelerator pedal position sensor .
ACCEL IDL . L Idling: ON
is detecting idle
Whether or not throttle position sensor is .
THROTTLE IDL Idling: ON

switch from rich to lean

FAIL #1 Whether or not fail safe function is executed ETCS is failed: ON
FAIL #2 Whether or not fail safe function is executed ETCS is failed: ON
THROTTLE LEAN VALUE Throttle fully closed learning value 04~08V
ACCEL LEAN VALUE Accelerator fully closed learning value 0.4~08V
THROTTLE MOTOR Throttle motor control current Idling: 0~ 3.0 A
ETCS MAG CLUTCH Magnetic clutch control current 08~10A
Total Fuel Trim Bank 1: Average value for fuel .
TOTAL FT B1 . Idling: 0.5~ 1.4
trim system of bank 1
Total Fuel Trim Bank 2: Average value for fuel .
TOTAL FT B2 . Idling: 0.5~ 1.4
trim system of bank 2
Oxygen Sensor Lean Rich Bank 1, Sensor 1
O2 LR B1, S1 Response time for oxygen sensor output to Idling after warming up: 0 ~ 1,000 msec.
switch from lean to rich
Oxygen Sensor Lean Rich Bank 2, Sensor 1
O2LR B2, S1 Response time for oxygen sensor output to Idling after warming up: 0 ~ 1,000 msec.
switch from lean to rich
Oxygen Sensor Rich Lean Bank 1, Sensor 1
O2RLB1,S1 Response time for oxygen sensor output to Idling after warming up: 0 ~ 1,000 msec.
switch from rich to lean
Oxygen Sensor Rich Lean Bank 1, Sensor 1
O2 RL B2, S1 Response time for oxygen sensor output to Idling after warming up: 0 ~ 1,000 msec.

*: If no conditions are specifically stated for "Idling”, it means the shift leveris at N or P position, the A/C switch

is OFF and all accessory switches are OFF.

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)




